North Dakota, session 69, HB1022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated from special funds, to the retirement and investment office for the
purpose of defraying the expenses of the retirement and investment office, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $8,552,467 $3,539,528 $12,091,995
New and vacant FTE pool 0 470,466 470,466
Operating expenses 2,731,037 1,054,096 3,785,133
Contingencies 200,000 0 200,000
Total special funds $11,483,504 $5,064,090 $16,547,594
Full-time equivalent positions 34.00 1.00 35.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Information technology consulting $0 $250,000 $250,000
Total $0 $250,000 $250,000
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
retirement and investment office may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line
item in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds
from the new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1022 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1022.
House Vote: Yeas 83 Nays 10 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 6 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State